Maryland, session 2025, SB0093.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
9–305.
(E) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
AT LEAST 60 DAYS BEFORE EACH STATEWIDE PRIMARY ELECTION, EACH LOCAL THE
LOCAL BOARD SHALL SEND THE A WRITTEN NOTICE REGARDING A REQUEST FOR A
STATE–APPROVED ABSENTEE BALLOT APPLICATION WITH A SPECIMEN BALLOT
MAILED UNDER § 8–102 OF THIS ARTICLE AND ANY OTHER MAILING TO EACH
ELIGIBLE VOTER VOTERS OR ELIGIBLE VOTERS TO FURTHER AWARENESS OF THE
OPTION OF MAIL–IN VOTING.
(2) A LOCAL BOARD IS NOT REQUIRED TO SEND THE
STATE–APPROVED ABSENTEE BALLOT APPLICATION TO NOTICE REQUIRED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION:
(I) TO A VOTER:
1. WHO HAS PERMANENT ABSENTEE BALLOT STATUS
UNDER § 9–311.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE; OR
– 1 –

Ch. 310 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
2. MORE THAN ONCE PER ELECTION; OR
(II) FOR A VOTE–BY–MAIL ELECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 2 –